bs_BA.dic
A/ks # Amper
antena/MA
aplicirati/EGCD
argumentovati/CDEO
arhitekt/A
banalizovati/CDEO
basirati/EDGC
baterija/MA
batinati/GECD
bečiti/EG
besciljna/MA
bezazlen/HLAI
bistrina/MA
biznis/IA
blag/HAIJL
blijed/HAJIL
bokal/AMN
boljetica/A
bradat/AHILJ
bređati/CEGD
brica/MA
brigu/a
brz/AJHLI
bubnjati/EGCD
bubuljičav/AILHJ
bujati/CDEG
cal/ks
cd/ks
centralizovati/CDEO
centriran/aHAIL
Cetina/A
C/ks
cvjetati/EGCD
čeprkati/DEGC
čestica/MA
četkan/AIHL
čitav/AJHLI
čuven/aAHIJL
čuvenja/A
ćaskati/CEDG
ćelav/AHIL
decentralizovati/CDEO
degenerisan/AHIJL
dekoncentrisati/CDEO
delikatna/aMA
demaskirati/EDCG
demistifikovati/CDEO
deregulisati/CDEO
destabilizovati/CDEO
dezavuirati/ECGD
dezintegrisati/CDEO
dijabetičar/AI
dimnjak/AN
dimova/A
diskreditovati/CDEO
divljak/AN
divljina/MA
djelati/EGCD
djetinjiti/GE
dobiven/AHLJI
dodirivati/CD
dogovor/IAH
dopadati/DEGC
dopustiv/aAHIJL
dosegnuti/a
doslovna/AM
dostavljati/CEGD
dotjeran/aALIHJ
dovijati/CDEG
držač/HI
duž/HIAL
dvojka/MA
dvosmislen/aAHIJL
dvostruk/IHALJ
egzistencijske/a
ejakulacija/A
eksperimentovati/CDEO
eksportovati/CDEO
evocirati/EGCD
evoluirati/GCED
fabrikovati/CDEO
festival/A
F/ks
foka/MA
formulisati/CDEO
fotografisati/CDEO
gad/AN
generisan/AHIL
g/ks
glagoljička/A
glasati/DECG
gluh/HLAJI
gomilati/CDEG
gostoljubiv/aAHILJ
grad/AN
građevna/AM
granati/DECG
grkljan/A
grupisan/ALHI
gušav/AJHIL
habati/ECGD
hendikepisati/CDEO
hepek/AN
hlad/NHA
hoditi/EG
hrabriti/EG
hrapavija/A
humanitarna/MA
Hz/ks
idealist/ALI
impresionirati/CEGD
improviziran/AHLJI
inaugurisati/CDEO
induktivnim/a
inicirati/EGDC
instruktor/LAHI
interesovati/CDEO
intimnija/A
ironizirati/CEGD
iskopčati/EGC
ispipati/EGC
isprekidan/aHLAIJ
istopiti/CE
istovremen/JAHLI
istražiti/CGE
izbačen/AHIL
izbrijana/A
izderanom/a
izdubljen/AHIL
izgrađen/aAHILJ
izjaloviti/CGE
izjasniti/ECG
izmetina/MA
izolirati/DGCE
izraz/AHI
izručiti/GCE
izviždan/AHLIJ
izvoljevati/ECGD
jara/A
jedinstvenosti/a
jednostran/HIAJL
jedriti/EG
jestiv/aHAIJL
jezovit/AHIL
J/ks
kalkulisati/CDEO
kapela/AM
karanja/A
K/ks
klasifikovati/CDEO
klor/LA
knjižar/IKA
kolonija/MA
kolonisati/CDEO
kombinisan/AHIJL
komercijalizovati/CDEO
komešati/GECD
konsolidovati/CDEO
konvergirati/ECGD
kooptirati/DGEC
koračića/A
korak/AN
korektna/aMA
korjenit/HLAIJ
kostur/AL
koščat/AIJHL
krak/AN
krčma/MA
kritikovati/CDEO
krivotvoren/AJHIL
kut/HLAJI
laštila/MA
lažljiv/AJLHI
ležaljka/MA
liberalizovati/CDEO
lijevati/DECG
lisnat/AHILJ
ložač/I
lupetati/CEGD
ljetno/zimsko
ljevičar/HILA
magistrirati/CGED
mahnitati/EGDC
majur/AKIL
makedonska/MA
mali/a
manipulisati/CDEO
metoda/AM
mješavina/MA
m/ks
mladolik/HALJI
mlitav/AHIJL
modifikovati/CDEO
moduliran/AHLIJ
moj/AHIL
mol/ks
momak/N
mučiti/EG
nadležnoga/a
nadvladati/GEC
nadvladavati/EGCD
nahuškati/CEG
najhitnija/A
namučiti/EC
nanula/MA
napravljen/AIHL
narančast/JAHLI
naseljen/aAIHLJ
nastanjen/aAHJIL
natrpati/ECG
navabiti/EC
nazočnosti/a
neutralizovati/CDEO
N/ks
nositi/EG
novinar/A
obavijati/CGDE
obazriv/aJAHIL
obilna/MA
obnovljen/HAILJ
obojen/aAHLIJ
obrazovan/aAILH
obvezujući/a
ocijediti/CEG
očetkati/EGC
odgađati/DECG
odstup/HAI
oglas/HIA
oglašavati/ECGD
ogorčiti/ECG
okititi/ECG
okrivljavati/EGCD
okrnjen/aAJHIL
okus/HAI
ometanih/a
onesviješten/AHIL
opržiti/EGC
opskrbljen/aAHLI
organizovati/CDEO
originalna/aMA
orobiti/CE
osamdeset/AHIJL
ostvariv/aAHIJL
osvjetlati/CEG
osvojenju/a
otapati/DGEC
otkriven/aAHIJL
otrijezniti/GCE
ovladati/GEC
oznojen/AHLIJ
pad/AN
padavičava/A
Pa/ks # Paskal, jedinica SI sitema za pritisak
patentiran/HILA
personifikovati/CDEO
pijan/AJIHL
pijanka/MA
pirkati/DCGE
pištati/ECDG
planiranog/a
pljesniv/HIAJL
pobratiti/ECG
počistiti/CEG
podana/A
podrezan/HILA
poetičnome/a
pogodak/N
pogovor/HAI
pohaban/JAHIL
pojačati/CEG
pokoriti/CEG
pokvariti/GCE
polemizirati/DGEC
poluautomatska/MA
poredan/HAIL
poskočiti/CGE
pospješiti/CEG
posrednik/A
posrednosti/a
postav/AHJI
postradati/EGC
posuđen/HAIL
potpun/aIJHLA
poznavanjem/a
praonica/AM
prazniti/GE
predstavljati/GCDE
predvoditi/GE
preferirati/CGED
prekontrolisati/CDEO
prekovremen/AHLI
prekrivenih/a
prelomljen/LAHI
prepečen/AHIL
preporučiti/CGE
prepoznavala/A
prestrojavati/DEGC
pretražiti/ECG
previjan/HLAIJ
pribavljati/CGED
prigrliti/GCE
prikladnijim/a
prilagođen/aAHILJ
primamljiv/HLAIJ
primarna/AM
principal/HILA
pripadati/EGDC
prispodobivoj/a
pristaviti/CEG
proderati/EGC
profesionalcima/a
profunkcionisati/CDEO
prognan/HJALI
progonitelja/A
progrizati/CGED
promeškoljiti/CE
promjer/HAI
prosvijetiti/CGE
proširiv/HIAL
protestovati/CDEO
provaliti/EGC
provedivoj/a
prozvan/AHIL
psiha/AM
rad/HAJLIN
rad/ks
raskliman/HLAIJ
raskućiti/EC
raspakiranim/a
raspitivati/CD
raspojasan/JAHIL
rastanak/N
rastrijezniti/EGC
rasturiti/EGC
rastvor/HLAI
razdvojiva/aA
razgovorljiv/aHIAJL
razigran/AIHL
razmrcvariti/EC
razvijen/aAJIHL
recenzirati/CEDG
reciklaža/aA
redefinisati/CDEO
reforma/MA
reintegrisati/CDEO
rekapitulirati/GDEC
restaurator/AIL
rezimirati/EGCD
robova/A
rodoljubiv/AJHIL
ruksak/AN
sakriven/aHAIL
salijevati/EDCG
samoća/AM
samostalnoj/a
sanjiv/AHLIJ
savladati/CGE
sazrijevati/ECGD
senzibilisati/CDEO
simpatičnoj/a
sirov/HAIJL
sjedinjen/IAHL
sjela/A
skalarna/MA
skratiti/EGC
sladunjav/HAJLI
slikovit/HALIJ
smiljenija/a
smočiti/GEC
smrad/AN
smrzavati/CGED
snen/LAHJI
spas/HAJ
specijalizovan/aAHIJL
spekulisati/CDEO
sponzorisati/CDEO
sportska/aMA
spretnijih/a
s/sk
stalak/N
stalna/aMA
stasit/HLAJI
stavljati/CGDE
strn/AJHLI
stupiti/EGC
subjektivnijih/a
sudopera/M
sunčan/AIJHL
suzdrživ/aAHIJL
suziti/ECG
šamarati/EGCD
šašav/AJHIL
šesnaest/JAHLI
škaklja/A
štedionica/MA
taktizirati/CEGD
tapšati/ECDG
temeljitošću/a
T/ks
tlapnja/AM
tolerisati/CDEO
tolik/HAJLI
topljiv/aAHIJL
transmitovati/CDEO
tričav/AJHIL
trijem/A
ubrojiv/aAHIJL
učitelj/nastavnik
udarati/DCGE
udvarati/CEGD
ugasiv/aAHIJL
ugledati/EGCD
ugljenizovati/CDEO
ugovorna/MA
uklesan/HAIL
ukršten/LAHI
umiven/aAHIJL
umjetničkih/a
unesen/AHIJL
upadati/CEGD
upaliti/CGE
upetljati/CEG
uporedak/N
uran/AHI
uroditi/ECG
urok/A
useljen/aAHIJL
usmjeren/aAHIJL
ustaljen/aAHIJL
utaboriti/CEG
utanačiti/CEG
utješna/aA
uvjerljiv/aAHIJL
uzbuđen/AHJIL
uživati/GCED
ventilacija/MA
ventilisati/CDEO
verziran/AIHJL
vezan/aAHIJL
vidati/CGED
visok/JAHLI
vjetrova/A
V/ks
Wh/ks
W/ks
zabavna/aMA
zaborav/aHAI
zabuniti/CGE
zadovoljstvo/a
zainteresovan/aAHIJL
zakloniti/CEG
zaključen/HALI
zakrpiti/CEG
zamagljen/AIHL
zamak/N
zamlatiti/CE
zapovijedan/HILA
zapovijedati/ECGD
zaprljan/aAHIJL
zasnivati/CGED
zastupnik/A
zavarati/EGC
završen/aAHIJL
zgrbljen/AHLJI
znamenit/HILAJ
zubobolja/AM
zvanoga/a
zvjerati/CEDG
žmirkav/HLAI
Ω/ks # Om
